Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3238.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (i) of section 139 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “that are not net metering
facilities of a municipality or other governmental entity under subsection (f)” both times they
appear.
of 1